Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 43 Educational Programs Under the Vocational and Applied Technology Education Act

16-43-1.
Expenditure of federal funds.

The department of elementary and secondary education is authorized to accept and direct the disbursement of funds appropriated by any acts of Congress and apportioned to the state in connection with 20 U.S.C. § 2301 et seq. The department of elementary and secondary education shall deposit all funds received from the federal government with the general treasurer, to be placed in a special account, and drawn upon only on receipt of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 57.

16-43-2.
Administration of program.

The department of elementary and secondary education may enter into any agreements with any agency of the federal government, any school committee, or any other agency or person, may prescribe any regulations, employ any personnel, and take any action that it may deem necessary to provide for the establishment, maintenance, operation, and expansion of any educational program under 20 U.S.C. § 2301 et seq., and to direct the disbursement of federal and state funds in accordance with existing provisions of the federal and state laws. The department of elementary and secondary education may give technical advice and assistance to any school committee in connection with the establishment and operation of any program and may assist in training personnel engaged in the operation of these programs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 57.

16-43-3.
Accounts and records.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall prescribe regulations for the keeping of accounts and records and the making of reports by or under the supervision of school committees. These accounts and records shall be available for inspection and audit by authorized agents of the federal government or by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education or his or her duly authorized agents. The department of elementary and secondary education shall conduct or cause to be conducted any audits, inspections, and administrative reviews of accounts, records, and operations with respect to educational programs established under 20 U.S.C. § 2301 et seq. considered necessary to determine whether its agreements with school committees and regulations pursuant to this chapter are being complied with, and to insure that those programs are effectively administered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 57.

16-43-4.
Annual appropriation.

The general assembly, shall annually appropriate any sum as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 118, § 1.